Illinois, session 104th, HB5463.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Higher Education Student Assistance Act is 5amended by changing Section 65.115 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 947/65.115)7    Sec. 65.115. School and Municipal Social Worker and School 8Counselor Work Shortage Loan Repayment Program.9    (a) To encourage Illinois students to work, and to 10continue to work, as a school social worker or school 11counselor for a in public school district districts in this 12State or to work as a social worker for a municipality in this 13in State municipalities, the Commission shall, each year, 14receive and consider applications for loan repayment 15assistance under this Section. This program shall be known as 16the School and Municipal Social Worker and School Counselor 17Work Shortage Loan Repayment Program. The Commission shall 18administer the program and shall adopt all necessary and 19proper rules to effectively implement the program.20    (b) Subject Beginning July 1, 2022, subject to a separate 21appropriation made for such purposes, the Commission shall 22award a grant, up to a maximum of $8,000 per year for a maximum 23of 4 years $6,500, to each qualified applicant. A The   HB5463 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 19840 LNS 33290 b1Commission may encourage the recipient of a grant awarded 2under this Section shall be used to use the grant award for 3repayment of the recipient's educational loan. If funds are 4insufficient to provide all qualified applicants with a grant 5as authorized by this Section, the Commission shall allocate 6the available grant funds for the fiscal year to qualified 7applicants who submit a complete application on or before a 8date specified by the Commission, based on the following order 9of priority:10        (1) first, to students who received a grant under this 11    Section in the prior fiscal year and who remain eligible 12    for a grant under this Section; and13        (2) then, to new, qualified applicants in accordance 14    with this Section. 15    (c) A person is a qualified applicant under this Section 16if he or she meets all of the following qualifications:17        (1) The person is a United States citizen or eligible 18    noncitizen.19        (2) The person is a resident of this State.20        (3) The person is a borrower with an outstanding 21    balance due on an educational loan related to obtaining a 22    degree in social work or obtaining the appropriate 23    education and training to work as a school counselor.24        (4) The person, at the time of application, has been 25    employed for at least 12 consecutive months as a school 26    social worker or school counselor by a public elementary   HB5463 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 19840 LNS 33290 b1    school or secondary school in this State for at least 12 2    consecutive months or as a social worker for an Illinois 3    municipality who did not report directly to a police 4    department.5        (5) The person, at the time of application, is 6    currently employed as a school social worker or school 7    counselor by a public elementary school or secondary 8    school in this State or as a social worker for an Illinois 9    municipality who does not report directly to a police 10    department.11    (d) An applicant shall submit an application, in a form 12determined by the Commission, for grant assistance under this 13Section to the Commission. An applicant is required to submit, 14with the application, supporting documentation as the 15Commission may deem necessary.16    (e) (Blank). 17(Source: P.A. 104-437, eff. 11-21-25.) 18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 192026.